GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/flex-noun.lexc
LEXICON N_en/ina	N=Sgs ;			! [das] Pronomen; [des] Pronomens
			Cp ;			! Pronomen-[bindung]
			0:^2ina	N=Pl ;		! [die/den] Pronomina
			0:^2ina	Cp_Pl ;		! Pronomina-[gruppe]


LEXICON N_x/e/izes	N=Sg(Es) ;		! [der] Index; des -(es)
			Cp ;			! Index-[seite]
			0:^+e	N=Pln ;		! Indexe
			0:^2izes N=Pl ;		! Indizes
			0:^2izes Cp_Pl ;	! Indizes-[???]

! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! "WEAK" noun inflection
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON	Nm=Wk	
	+Sg+Nom:0			Upp ;	! [der] Automat
	+Sg+AccDatGen:00^+en		Upp ;	! [den/dem/des] Automaten
	+Pl+NomAccDatGen:00^+en		Upp ;	! [die/den] Automaten

LEXICON	Nm=Wk2	
	+Sg+Nom:0			Upp ;	! [der] Nachbar
	+Sg+AccDatGen:00^+n		Upp ;	! [den/dem/des] Nachbarn
	+Pl+NomAccDatGen:00^+n		Upp ;	! [die/den] Nachbarn
			

LEXICON	Nf=Wk	
	+Sg+NomAcc:0			Upp ;	! [die] Gerade
	+Sg+DatGen:00^+en		Upp ;	! [der] Geraden
	+Pl+NomAccDatGen:00^+en		Upp ;	! [die/den] Geraden
			

! with compounding:
LEXICON Nm_Wk
				Nm=Wk ;
				Cp ;		! ??
	0:^+en			Cp_Pl ;

LEXICON Nm_Wk2
				Nm=Wk2 ;
				Cp ;		! ??
	0:^+n			Cp_Pl ;		! ??

LEXICON Nm_WkS					! cf. Duden Grammatik [436]
				Nm_Wk ;		! der Fürst, dem/den/des/die Fürsten
				N=SgEs ;	! der/dem/den Fürst, des Fürsts
			
LEXICON Nf_Wk
				Nf=Wk ;
				Cp ;		! ??
	0:^+en			Cp_Pl ;

			
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! PROPER NAMES

LEXICON Name=Sg
  +Sg+NomAccDatGen:0		Upp ;	! Peter, Anna, Hans; der kleinen Anna
  +Sg+GenS:^PGen		Upp ;	! Peters, Annas, Hans'
  +Sg:0				Trunc- ;  

LEXICON Name_Sg
	Name=Sg ;
	Compound ;


! ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Last names
LEXICON P=Last
  +Sg+NomAccDatGen:0		Upp ;		! das Werk des jungen Goethe
  +Pl+NomAccDatGen:^PPl		Upp ;		! bei Müllers
  +Sg+GenS:^PGen		Upp ;		! das Werk Goethes
  ^}sch+Adj			A_reg ;		! schillersche
  +Sg:0				Trunc- ;	! Schiller-[Schule]

LEXICON P_Last			P=Last ;
				Compound ;	! Roentgen[apparat]
